Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3793.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 567.12, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 567.12. A. To qualify in this state as an approved
program for registered nurses, the program shall be conducted in the
State of Oklahoma in an accredited college or university leading to
an associate, baccalaureate, or higher degree in nursing. Such
programs shall meet the standards fixed by the Oklahoma Board of
Nursing and prescribed in its rules.
B. To qualify in the State of Oklahoma as an approved diploma
program for registered nurses, or an LPN-to-Diploma-RN ladder
program for registered nurses, the program shall be conducted in the
Req. No. 16560 Page 1

Stat e of Oklahoma in a technology center approved by the Oklahoma
Department of Career and Technology Education, a nationally
accredited college, or an accredited college or university and shall
meet the standards fixed by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing as
prescribed in its rules unless otherwise prescribed in the Oklahoma
Nursing Practice Act. Length of approved diploma RN programs shall
be:
1. Standalone diploma programs for registered nurses shall have
a minimum of one thousand three hundred (1,300) clock hours, but not
to exceed one thousand five hundred (1,500) clock hours, in nursing
education. This shall include nursing education consisting of
didactic, laboratory, and clinical courses. Additional required
non-nursing coursework shall not exceed three hundred thirty (330)
clock hours or twenty-one (21) credit hours;
2. LPN-to-Diploma-RN ladder programs awarding credit to
Licensed Practical Nurses shall have a minimum of six hundred (600)
clock hours beyond the practical nursing education, but not to
exceed seven hundred (700) clock hours in nursing education. This
shall include nursing education consisting of didactic, laboratory,
and clinical courses. Additional required non-nursing coursework
shall not exceed three hundred thirty (330) clock hours or twenty-
one (21) credit hours and may include non-nursing coursework
completed in practical nursing education.

Req. No. 16560 Page 2

C. To qualify in this state as an approved program for
practical nurses, the program shall be conducted in this state in a
school or skill center approved by the Oklahoma Department of Career
and Technology Education or licensed by the Oklahoma Board of
Private Vocational Schools. Such programs shall meet the standards
fixed by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing as prescribed in its rules,
which shall conform to the provisions of this subsection.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16560 TJ 02/18/26














Req. No. 16560 Page 3